Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 4 Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
24-4-603. Refund of contributions.

In the event a former member has left the employ of a participating public employer and requests a refund of his or her accumulated contributions, he or she shall be paid the contributions upon his or her written application for a refund on a form to be supplied by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The former member may receive interest on the contributions if he or she has had accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account for at least five (5) years between the date he or she became a member of the system and the date he or she requests the refund of contributions.

The interest shall be paid at a rate and method to be determined by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and shall be calculated on the balance in the members' deposit account on the last June 30 prior to the date he or she obtains his or her refund.

If a former member has applied for a refund of contributions but returns to employment with a participating public employer prior to the date he or she receives his or her refunded contributions, his or her request shall be void and he or she must again terminate his or her employment to request a refund of contributions.

Refunds of a member's contributions or accumulated contributions, as the case may be, may be made in equal installments according to such rules as the board may adopt from time to time.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 11; 1959, No. 42, § 11; 1975, No. 907, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2858.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (e).

24-4-604. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning payment of prior service annuity purchased by member, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. The section was derived from Acts 1975, No. 907, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511.11.

24-4-605. Proration of public employer share of annuity reserve.

In the event a member retires with credited service arising from his or her employment by the state, a county, and a municipality, the public employer share of his or her annuity reserve shall be prorated between the state division, county division, and municipal division in accordance with the portions of his or her credited service acquired under each division.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 11; 1961, No. 64, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

These division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

24-4-606. Annuity options.

Before the date the first payment of a member's annuity becomes due, but not thereafter, a member may elect to receive his or her annuity as a straight life annuity or may elect to have his or her annuity reduced and nominate a beneficiary in accordance with the provisions of one (1) of the following options:

Option A60 — 60 Months Certain and Life Annuity.

Under Option A60, the retirant shall be paid a reduced annuity for life with the provision that if the retirant's death occurs before sixty (60) monthly payments have been made, the full reduced annuity shall continue to be paid for the remainder of the sixty (60) months to such persons and in such shares as the retirant shall have designated in writing and filed with the plan. If there is no payee surviving, the lump-sum actuarial equivalent of the remaining monthly payments shall be paid to the estate of the last survivor among the retirant and the designated persons.

The reduced annuity shall be ninety-eight percent (98%) of the straight life annuity;

Option A120 — 120 Months Certain and Life Annuity.

Under Option A120, the retirant shall be paid a reduced annuity for life with the provision that if the retirant's death occurs before one hundred twenty (120) monthly payments have been made, the full reduced annuity shall continue to be paid for the remainder of the one hundred twenty (120) months to such persons and in such shares as the retirant shall have designated in writing and filed with the plan. If there is no payee surviving, the lump sum actuarial equivalent of the remaining monthly payments shall be paid to the estate of the last survivor among the retirant and the designated persons.

The reduced annuity shall be ninety-four percent (94%) of the straight life annuity;

Option B50 — 50 Percent Survivor Beneficiary Annuity.

Under Option B50, the retirant shall be paid a reduced annuity for life with the provision that upon the retirant's death one-half (½) of the reduced annuity shall be continued throughout the future lifetime of and paid to such person as the retirant shall have designated in writing and filed with the plan before his or her annuity's starting date.

However, the person must be either his or her spouse for not less than six (6) months immediately preceding the first payment due date or another person aged forty (40) or older receiving more than one-half (1/2) support from the retirant for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the first payment due date.

The reduced annuity to the retirant shall be eighty-eight percent (88%) if the retirant's age and his or her beneficiary's age are the same on the first payment due date, which shall be decreased by one-half of one percent (0.5%), for each year that the beneficiary's age is less than the retirant's age, or which shall be increased by one-half of one percent (0.5%), up to a maximum of ninety-five percent (95%), for each year that the beneficiary's age is more than the retirant's age.

However, if the named beneficiary under Option B50 predeceases the retirant, the original unreduced benefit shall be paid to the retirant prospectively; or

Option B75 — 75 Percent Survivor Beneficiary Annuity.

Under Option B75, the retirant shall be paid a reduced annuity for life with the provision that, upon his or her death, three-fourths (¾) of the reduced annuity shall be continued throughout the future lifetime of, and paid to, such person as the retirant shall have designated in writing and filed with the plan before his or her annuity's starting date.

However, the person must be either the retirant's spouse for not less than six (6) months immediately preceding the first payment due date or another person aged forty (40) or older receiving more than one-half (½) support from the retirant for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the first payment due date.

The reduced annuity to the retirant shall be eighty-three percent (83%) if the retirant's age and his or her beneficiary's age are the same on the first due date, which shall be decreased by seven-tenths of one percent (0.7%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is less than the retirant's age or which shall be increased by seven-tenths of one percent (0.7%) up to a maximum of ninety percent (90%) for each year that the beneficiary's age is more than the retirant's age.

However, if the named beneficiary under Option B75 predeceases the retirant, the original unreduced benefit shall be paid to the retirant prospectively.

A death of a spouse or divorce or other marriage dissolution or the death of a person forty (40) years of age or older who is the designated beneficiary under Option B50 or Option B75 shall cancel, at the written election of the retirant, Option B50 or Option B75 at retirement, providing continuing lifetime benefits to the designated person, and shall return the retirant to his or her straight life, Option A60, or Option A120 annuity, to be effective the month following receipt of his or her election by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

A retirant who is receiving a straight life, Option A60, or Option A120 annuity and who marries after retirement or within the one (1) year immediately preceding retirement may elect to cancel his or her straight life, Option A60, or Option A120 annuity and may elect Option B50 or Option B75, providing continuing lifetime benefits to his or her spouse, but only if the election is on a form approved by the system and is received by the system not earlier than one (1) year after the date of the marriage and not later than eighteen (18) months after that date.

The election shall be effective the first day of the month following the receipt of the notice.

If a member fails to elect an option, his or her annuity shall be paid to him or her as a straight life annuity.

The surviving spouse of a system member who retired prior to July 1, 1967, shall receive a monthly survivor's annuity equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the retirant's monthly benefit at the time of death, provided that the surviving spouse was married to the retirant on the date of retirement, the surviving spouse is unmarried, and the surviving spouse makes application to the system on or before June 30, 1995.

The monthly survivor's annuity shall be effective the first day of the month following the month of application, and no annuity will be paid the surviving spouse for any period prior to the first of the month following the month of application.

The surviving spouse of a member of the system who retired on or after February 1, 1991, and who elected a straight life annuity shall be entitled to receive a survivor's annuity equal to the amount that would have been received had the member elected Option B75, provided:

The member dies within twelve (12) months of the effective date of retirement; and

The surviving spouse makes application to the system within twelve (12) months of the date of the member's death.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 11; 1967, No. 108, § 4; 1979, No. 715, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511; Acts 1993, No. 973, § 1; 1993, No. 1200, § 2; 2001, No. 151, § 32; 2001, No. 438, §§ 1, 2; 2005, No. 383, § 1; 2019, No. 625, §§ 1, 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 438, § 3, provided:

“Application of the provisions of this Act. The increases in reduced annuity option amounts provided in this act shall not apply to retirees or survivors whose effective date of benefits occurred before July 1, 2001.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added the (a)(3)(A)(i), (a)(3)(A)(ii), (a)(4)(A)(i), and (a)(4)(A)(ii) designations; and substituted “six (6) months” for “one (1) year” in (a)(3)(A)(ii) and (a)(4)(A)(ii).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 625, § 4, provided: “Retroactivity. This act applies retroactively to January 1, 2017”.

24-4-607. Redetermination of benefits.

Each July 1 the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall redetermine the amount of each monthly benefit which has been payable by the system for at least twelve (12) full calendar months. The redetermined amount shall be payable for the following twelve (12) calendar months.

The redetermined amount shall be the amount of the benefit payable as of the immediately preceding July 1 increased by three percent (3%).

History.

Acts 1973, No. 666, § 5; 1979, No. 715, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511.6; Acts 1987, No. 477, § 1; 1991, No. 432, § 2; 1997, No. 299, § 19; 1999, No. 39, § 2.

24-4-608. Payment of benefits upon death of member before retirement — Exception.

Effective July 1, 2001, if an active member or former member with five (5) or more years of actual service dies before retirement, the applicable benefits provided in this section shall be paid upon written application to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

For purposes of computing benefits provided by this section, the deceased member's or former member's compensation at the time of death shall be the member's compensation for the year immediately preceding the cessation of his or her pay.

A member's or former member's surviving spouse who was married to the member at least six (6) months immediately preceding his or her death shall receive an annuity computed in the same manner in all respects as if the member or former member had:

Retired the date of his or her death with entitlement to an annuity provided for in § 24-4-601;

Elected the Option B75 survivor annuity provided for in § 24-4-606(a)(4); and

Nominated his or her spouse as joint beneficiary.

If the member or former member had satisfied the age and service requirements provided for in § 24-4-101 or had acquired twenty (20) years of actual service, the spouse annuity shall commence immediately and be payable for life. If the member or former member had not satisfied the age and service requirement provided for in § 24-4-101 or had not acquired twenty (20) years of actual service, then the spouse annuity shall commence immediately and be payable until the earlier of his or her remarriage or death.

A surviving spouse who is otherwise eligible but whose benefit has been deferred because the spouse did not meet the age requirements in effect before July 1, 1999, shall be eligible to commence a spouse annuity effective July 1, 1999. The spouse annuity shall not be retroactive.

The spouse annuity shall not be less than ten percent (10%) of the deceased member's or former member's covered compensation at the time of death.

In any event, as long as the surviving spouse has in his or her care any of the deceased member's or former member's dependent children receiving a benefit provided for in this section, there shall be payable to him or her a spouse annuity as indicated in this section which shall not be less than ten percent (10%) of the deceased member's or former member's compensation at the time of death.

A member's or former member's dependent child or dependent children shall each receive an annuity of the greater of either ten percent (10%) of the member's or former member's covered compensation at the time of death or an equal share of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) monthly.

Where there are three (3) or more dependent children, each dependent child shall receive an annuity of an equal share of the greater of either twenty-five percent (25%) of the covered compensation or one hundred fifty dollars ($150) monthly.

A child shall be a dependent child until the child's death, marriage, or attainment of age eighteen (18), whichever occurs first.

However, the age-eighteen maximum shall be extended as long as the child continues uninterruptedly being a full-time student at an accredited secondary school, college, or university, but in no event beyond his or her attainment of age twenty-three (23).

In addition, the age-eighteen maximum shall be extended for any child who has been deemed physically or mentally incompetent by an Arkansas court of competent jurisdiction or by the board, for as long as the incompetency exists.

Upon a child's ceasing to be a dependent child, his or her annuity shall terminate, and there shall be a redetermination of the amounts payable to any remaining dependent children.

If at the time of the member's or former member's death there is neither a spouse nor a dependent child, each dependent parent shall receive an allowance of the greater of ten percent (10%) of the covered compensation or an equal share of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) monthly, but only if the board finds that the parent was dependent for at least fifty percent (50%) of his or her financial support upon the member or former member.

If no annuity can become payable to a dependent child due to the death of the member or former member and a surviving spouse or dependent parents are the only persons who will be eligible for monthly benefits and the spouse or dependent parents are also the designated beneficiaries of the member or former member, then, in that event, the surviving spouse or dependent parents may elect to receive a refund of the member's or former member's accumulated contributions as provided in § 24-4-602(d) in lieu of any benefits which could become payable under this act.

The option to choose a refund of the member's or former member's contributions shall also be afforded to any spouse or dependent parent qualified under this section whose eligibility for the benefit occurred before the passage of this act and who could not exercise the option.

Once the refund of the deceased member's or former member's accumulated contributions has been made to the surviving spouse or dependent parents under this section, the person shall have no future claim to monthly retirement benefits due to the death of the member or former member.

In the event that all the annuities provided for in this section payable on account of the death of a member or former member terminate before there has been paid an aggregate amount equal to his or her accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in the members' deposit account at the time of his or her death, the difference between the accumulated contributions and the aggregate amount of annuity payments shall be paid to such person as he or she shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board.

If there is no designated person surviving at termination, the difference shall be paid to the member's or former member's estate.

Annuities payable under the provisions of this section shall be effective the first day of the calendar month next following the date of the member's or former member's death or the first day of the month following the month in which the survivor becomes eligible for benefits as provided by law.

The provisions of this section shall not be applicable in determining survivor benefits under the General Assembly Division or the State Constitutional Officers' Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System if a benefit is provided to the surviving spouse by other laws applicable to the Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System.

The benefits provided in this section for former members shall not apply to former members who terminated covered employment prior to July 1, 1997, with less than ten (10) years of service or whose death occurred before July 1, 2001.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 907, §§ 15, 18; 1977, No. 663, § 4; 1979, No. 715, § 4; 1981, No. 859, § 10; 1983, No. 637, § 1; 1985, No. 938, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2511.12, 12-2511.15; Acts 1993, No. 432, §§ 9, 10; 1997, No. 299, § 20; 1999, No. 325, § 9; 1999, No. 1450, § 2; 2001, No. 151, § 33; 2001, No. 356, § 1; 2019, No. 625, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The General Assembly Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage of this act,” Acts 1977, No. 663 was signed by the Governor and became effective on March 23, 1977.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “six (6) months” for “the one (1) year” in the introductory language of (c)(1).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1977, No. 663, codified as §§ 24-2-402, 24-4-202, 24-4-511, 24-4-608 and 24-4-609.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 625, § 4, provided: “Retroactivity. This act applies retroactively to January 1, 2017”.

24-4-609. Effective date of benefits.

All monthly benefits payable to survivors of deceased members or retirants of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall be effective the first day of the month following the month in which the member or retirant died or the first day of the month following the month in which the survivor becomes eligible for benefits as provided by law.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 663, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511.17.

24-4-610. Increased benefits for persons retiring by June 1, 1985.

On July 1, 1987, the monthly retirement benefit payable to retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who retired June 1, 1985, or before, shall be increased as follows:

Those retirants and beneficiaries who retired June 1, 1985, or before, shall receive five percent (5%) of the benefit amount payable June 1, 1986, for each full year from the date of retirement through June 1, 1987, with a maximum increase payable of twenty percent (20%) of the June 1, 1987, retirement benefit;

The following schedule shall be used to determine the percent of increase due:

The increase in benefits provided in subsection (a) of this section shall be added to the monthly benefit after the annual postretirement increase based on the consumer price index has been applied.

The increase provided in subsection (a) of this section shall be added to the base annuity of the member or beneficiary.

Date of Retirement Percent of Increase 7-1-85 and after
0% 7-1-84 through 6-1-85
5% 7-1-83 through 6-1-84 10% 7-1-82 through 6-1-83 11% 7-1-81 through 6-1-82 12% 7-1-80 through 6-1-81 13% 7-1-79 through 6-1-80 14% 7-1-78 through 6-1-79 15% 7-1-77 through 6-1-78 16% 7-1-76 through 6-1-77 17% 7-1-75 through 6-1-76 18% Before 7-1-75 20%

Click to view table.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 865, § 1; 1985, No. 552, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511.23; Acts 1987, No. 809, § 1.

24-4-611. Minimum monthly benefit.

All persons who are now vested or who hereafter vest under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System shall be entitled to a minimum monthly benefit of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

History.

Acts 1989, No. 547, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 547, § 2, provided:

“All persons who on the effective date of this Act receive benefits under the Public Employees Retirement System or the State Highway Employees Retirement System, and whose monthly benefits are less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per month, shall have their monthly benefits increased to one hundred and fifty dollars ($150) per month effective with the first benefit payment payable after the effective date of this Act.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 547, § 1, is also codified as § 24-5-124.

24-4-612. Increase in benefits.

On July 1, 1991, the monthly retirement benefit payable to retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, who retired June 1, 1991, or before, shall be increased by four percent (4%) of the benefit payable on June 1, 1991.

The increase in benefits provided in subsection (a) of this section shall be added to the monthly benefit after the annual postretirement increase based on the consumer price index has been applied, and the increase in subsection (a) of this section shall be added to the base annuity of the retirant or beneficiary.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 380, § 1.

24-4-613. Benefits for contributory members.

All contributory members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who are retired as of August 13, 1993, or who retire after August 13, 1993, shall receive benefits at least equal to the amount of benefits they would have received had they retired as noncontributory members of the system.

The provisions of this section are retroactive to January 1, 1993.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 722, §§ 1, 2.

24-4-614. Increase in monthly benefit amount — 1993.

On July 1, 1993, the monthly retirement benefit payable to retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who retired on June 1, 1993, or before, shall be increased by two and sixty-one hundredths percent (2.61%) of the benefit payable on June 1, 1993.

The increase in benefits provided in subsection (a) of this section shall be added to the monthly benefit after application of the annual postretirement increase, which is based on the consumer price index.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 938, § 1.

24-4-615. Maximum benefit limitation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, benefits paid under the provisions of this chapter shall not exceed the limitations of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 415 that are applicable to governmental retirement plans.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System is hereby empowered and authorized to promulgate all necessary rules to implement the limitations of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 415.

The rules adopted by the board pursuant to this section shall be amended to reflect any changes in the content or application of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 415 enacted by the United States Congress or promulgated by the Internal Revenue Service.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 738, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2859.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1) and (b)(2).

24-4-616. Increase in monthly benefit amount — 1995.

On July 1, 1995, the monthly benefit payable to retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who retired on June 1, 1995, or before, shall be increased by six and forty-five-hundredths percent (6.45%) of the benefit payable on June 1, 1995.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 630, § 1.

24-4-617. Increase in monthly benefit amount — 1997.

On July 1, 1997, the monthly retirement benefit payable to retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who retired on or before June 1, 1997, shall be increased by three percent (3%) of the benefit payable on June 1, 1997.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 318, § 3.

24-4-618. Increased benefits for persons retired before July 1, 1999.

On July 1, 1999, and thereafter, the monthly benefit payable to the retirants and the beneficiaries of retirants of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who retired before July 1, 1989, shall be increased by an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the benefit payable on June 1, 1999, for each year or portion of a year of retirement prior to July 1, 1989.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 496, § 3.

24-4-619. Increased benefits for persons retired before June 1, 1999.

In addition to the monthly retirement benefit increase provided in § 24-4-618, each retirant and beneficiary of a retirant of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who retired on or before June 1, 1999, shall receive an increase in his or her monthly benefit of fifty dollars ($50.00).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 496, § 4.

24-4-620. Partial annuity withdrawal provision.

Any member who does not terminate employment and retire on the date that member meets the age and service requirements of § 24-4-508 for an unreduced annuity and has not elected to participate in the Deferred Retirement Option Plan as provided in § 24-4-801 et seq. may elect at the time of retirement to participate in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement Partial Annuity Withdrawal Program.

A member electing to participate shall be eligible to receive, at the time of retirement, a lump-sum distribution in an amount not exceeding one (1) month of benefit for each completed month of service beyond eligibility for an unreduced benefit. The lump sum shall not exceed an amount equal to sixty (60) months of benefits.

A member electing to participate shall have his or her lifetime annuity reduced by an actuarially determined equivalent in accordance with rules adopted by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 357, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2860.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c).

24-4-621. Increase in benefits.

On July 1, 2001, the monthly retirement benefit payable to retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who retired on or before June 1, 2001, shall be increased by one and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the benefit payable on June 1, 2001.

The increase in benefits provided in subsection (a) of this section shall be added to the monthly benefit after the annual postretirement increase.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 355, § 2.

24-4-622. Monthly benefit increase.

On July 1, 2007, the monthly retirement benefit payable to retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who retired on or before June 1, 2007, shall be increased by one percent (1%) of the benefit payable on June 1, 2007.

The increase in benefits under subsection (a) of this section shall be added to the monthly benefit after the annual postretirement increase.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1568, § 1.